Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2106
Plan, lay out, or supervise certain activities; license required; exceptions.

Except as provided in section 81-2108, 81-2112, or 81-2144, no person shall, for another, plan, lay out, or supervise the installation of wiring, apparatus, or equipment for electrical light, heat, power, or other purposes unless he or she is licensed by the board as a Class B electrical contractor, an electrical contractor, or a Class A master electrician.

Laws 1975, LB 525, § 7;

Laws 1978, LB 833, § 4;

R.S.Supp.,1980, § 81-577;

Laws 1993, LB 193, § 6;

Laws 2003, LB 126, § 5;

Laws 2019, LB65, § 2;

Laws 2024, LB144, § 2.